Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202672-806
Enforcement.

The enforcement provisions of Chapter 1 of the 2018 International Energy Conservation Code, published by the International Code Council, shall not apply to buildings subject to section 72-804.

Laws 1999, LB 755, § 3;

Laws 2003, LB 643, § 4;

Laws 2004, LB 888, § 3;

Laws 2011, LB329, § 3;

Laws 2019, LB405, § 5.